District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

33-517

Liability of limited partner to partnership; waiver of liabilities.

Repealed.

Sept. 28, 1962, 76 Stat. 658, Pub. L. 87-716, § 17
Dec. 10, 1987, D.C. Law 7-49, § 1105, 34 DCR 6856

History

1981 Ed., § 41-217.
1973 Ed., § 41-417.

Prior Codifications